ext/fulltext/data/dicts/french/fulltext.dict
afflouais/jnlv
affouillai/jnlw
affouragerai/jnlx
analgésiais/jnmtlv
anglaisai/jnlw
angoisserai/jnmtlx
assommais/jnmtlv
assonai/jnw
assouplirai/jnmtlx
barricaderai/x
barétais/v
basanai/w
bidouiller/y
botter/y
bouillonnais/vc
boulangerai/x
bouleversais/vc
bouquinai/w
brocarder/y
cacaberai/x
cadanchais/v
cadmiai/w
calciner/y
calmais/vc
carrosser/y
caverai/x
ceinturais/v
centrifugeai/w
charcuter/y
charmais/vc
circonscrire/z
circonvenir/z
ciseler/y
civiliserai/x
clabaudais/v
clapai/w
cogitais/vc
commencer/y
comprendre/z
comprimais/vc
concoctais/v
concorderai/x
concourir/z
concélébrai/w
conforter/y
conjoindre/z
conquérir/z
constituais/vc
contenir/z
contraindre/z
contre-sceller/y
contredisais/d
contrefaisais/d
contrevenir/z
convenir/z
cooptais/v
coopérerai/x
copulai/w
coudre/RDz
coupais/vc
courbaturer/y
courir/Rz
couvrir/DRz
craindre/z
cuiterai/x
culais/v
culotter/y
cumulai/w
dansais/vc
dialyser/y
disconvenir/z
disjoindre/z
dissonerai/x
disséquais/v
divergeai/w
documenter/y
dressais/vc
débiter/y
débullerai/x
débâillonnais/v
décalottai/w
décauser/y
décroître/z
décruerai/x
décrétais/v
décédai/w
dédisais/d
défier/y
dégourdissais/vc
déhancherai/x
déjetais/v
délainai/w
démantibuler/y
dénuerai/x
dépariais/v
dépassionnai/w
déposséder/y
désamorcerai/x
désassimilais/v
désavouai/w
désespérais/vc
déshabituer/y
détaillerai/x
déteindre/z
détissais/v
détortillai/w
dévalorisais/vc
embusquerai/jnmtlx
emmurai/jnmtlw
emmétrais/jnlv
enfaîterai/jnlx
enfournai/jnmtlw
enfutaillais/jnmtlv
entrecouperai/jnmtlx
entêtai/jnlw
enveloppais/jnmtlv
expédierai/jnmtlx
fabulai/w
faiblissais/vc
falsifier/y
filais/vc
flotterai/x
foliotai/w
forcissais/v
forfaisais/d
formalisais/vc
franciser/y
frisottais/vc
fédérerai/x
galbais/vc
galvaudai/w
garançais/v
geindre/z
glorifiais/vc
grainer/y
grefferai/x
gringuai/w
grisonnais/vc
grognais/v
horrifierai/jnmtlx
humiliai/jnmtlw
hypostasiais/jnlv
inféoderai/jnlx
insensibilisai/jnmtlw
instaurais/jnmtlv
interdisais/jnmtld
jaillissais/vc
jardiner/y
jouerai/x
labialisai/w
laminais/v
lissais/vc
lâcherai/x
lécher/y
madrigalisai/w
maillais/v
maintenir/z
malfaisais/dc
mandais/vc
mercantiliserai/x
miaulais/vc
mimai/w
mimer/y
mirais/v
monopolisais/vc
mutilais/vc
mutilerai/x
médisais/dc
médusai/w
méfaisais/d
méprendre/z
mésestimais/v
métamorphoser/y
nasillais/vc
ocrerai/jnlx
opposai/jnmtlw
organsinais/jnlv
paralysais/vc
parcourir/z
parfaisais/d
parquer/y
peindre/DRz
perturbais/vc
pimenterai/x
pistachai/w
planquais/v
platiniser/y
poindre/z
polluais/vc
pouvais/d
prescrire/z
provenir/z
prédisais/d
préfacer/y
puais/vc
pâterai/x
périmai/w
questionnais/v
rainurer/y
rampais/vc
rapprendre/z
recomparaître/y
recoquillerai/x
recrachai/w
redevenir/z
redéfaisais/d
redémarrais/v
remonter/y
remplaçais/vc
renveloppe/z
ressayerai/x
ressouvenir/z
ressouvins/w
rester/y
reteindre/z
retranscrivais/v
revenais/vc
revenir/z
réapprendre/z
réceptionner/y
récitais/vc
réinscrire/z
réinventerai/x
réoccupai/w
résonnais/vc
révoltais/vc
rééduquer/y
s'abonnissait/q
s'abritait/p
s'abrutissait/q
s'abâtardissait/q
s'abêtissait/q
s'acclamait/p
s'accomplissait/q
s'accoutre/p
s'acharne/p
s'adoucissait/q
s'adresse/p
s'affadissait/q
s'affaiblissait/q
s'affermissait/q
s'affranchissait/q
s'agençait/p
s'agrandissait/q
s'aguerrissait/q
s'aigrissait/q
s'alanguissait/q
s'alcoolisait/p
s'amaigrissait/q
s'amarinait/p
s'amoindrissait/q
s'amortissait/q
s'ancrait/p
s'anéantissait/q
s'aplatissait/q
s'appelait/p
s'applaudissait/q
s'arquait/p
s'arrondissait/q
s'asservissait/q
s'assiège/p
s'assortissait/q
s'assouplissait/q
s'assouvissait/q
s'attendrissait/q
s'attrapait/p
s'avachissait/q
s'aveuglait/p
s'aveulissait/q
s'effraie/p
s'embellissait/q
s'embranchait/p
s'empale/p
s'encense/p
s'endurcissait/q
s'enfile/p
s'engloutissait/q
s'enhardissait/q
s'enjuive/p
s'enorgueillissait/q
s'enrubannait/p
s'ensevelissait/q
s'entrecroisait/p
s'esquivait/p
s'excuse/p
s'expulse/p
s'humilie/p
s'imagine/p
s'impute/p
s'infléchissait/q
s'inféodait/p
s'insultait/p
s'invaginait/p
s'obscurcissait/q
s'occupe/p
s'unifiait/p
s'éblouissait/q
s'écaille/p
s'écorche/p
s'éguillait/p
s'élargissait/q
s'énerve/p
s'épanouissait/q
s'éprouve/p
s'étoffait/p
s'étourdissait/q
s'évitait/p
satisfaisais/dc
secourir/z
servais/vc
smasher/y
soufrerai/x
soulignai/w
soutenir/z
spatialisais/v
stagnais/vc
subvenir/z
suggestionner/y
surabondais/vc
surfaisais/d
survenir/z
tanniserai/x
taquai/w
taquiner/y
temporisais/vc
tergiversais/v
tordais/vc
transcrire/z
transporter/y
tremblais/vc
twisterai/x
télécommandai/w
vaironnais/v
variais/vc
vermiculer/y
vouloir/Rz
écouvillonnerai/jnlx
éditai/jnmtlw
électrocutais/jnmtlv
